Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202538-2120
Board; membership; qualifications.

(1) This subsection applies prior to July 1, 2026. The board shall consist of nine professional members and two public members appointed pursuant to section 38-158. The members shall meet the requirements of sections 38-164 and 38-165. Two professional members shall be certified master social workers, two professional members shall be certified professional counselors, two professional members shall be certified marriage and family therapists, one professional member shall be a certified art therapist, and two professional members shall be licensed mental health practitioners that do not hold an associated certification.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2026, the board shall consist of eleven professional members and three public members appointed pursuant to section 38-158. The members shall meet the requirements of sections 38-164 and 38-165. Two professional members shall be certified master social workers, two professional members shall be certified professional counselors, two professional members shall be certified marriage and family therapists, one professional member shall be a certified art therapist, two professional members shall be licensed mental health practitioners that do not hold an associated certification, and two professional members shall be licensed alcohol and drug counselors.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 738;

Laws 2024, LB605, § 11;

Laws 2025, LB346, § 15.